Indiana, session 2026, HB1222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-8-2-243.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 243.5. "Retention pond", for
purposes of IC 14-27-7.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 14-27-7.5-4.5.
SECTION 2. IC 14-27-7.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A structure that meets the following conditions:
(A) Is built for the sole purpose of erosion control, watering
livestock, recreation, or providing a haven or refuge for fish or
wildlife.
(B) Has a drainage area above the dam of not more than one
(1) square mile.
(C) Does not exceed twenty (20) feet in height.
(D) Does not impound a volume of more than one hundred
(100) acre-feet of water.
2026 IN 1222—LS 6666/DI 150


(2) A structure that is regulated under the federal Mine Safety and
Health Act of 1977, unless the structure is proposed to be retained
as a permanent structure after bond release.
(3) Except for a structure under subsection (b), a structure that is
a low hazard dam or a significant hazard dam that meets only one
(1) of the following conditions:
(A) Has a drainage area above the dam of not more than one
(1) square mile.
(B) Does not exceed twenty (20) feet in height.
(C) Does not impound a volume of more than one hundred
(100) acre-feet of water.
(4) A retention pond.
(b) This chapter applies to a structure that is listed on the roster of
low head dams provided in IC 14-27-7.3.
SECTION 3. IC 14-27-7.5-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. As used in this chapter,
"retention pond" means a manmade basin that is:
(1) designed to collect and store surface water in an
impervious membrane liner; and
(2) not connected to a natural:
(A) river;
(B) stream; or
(C) lake.
2026 IN 1222—LS 6666/DI 150